Maine, session 132, LD1138.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§84-B is enacted to read:
84-B.
Transportation: Transportation Climate Not Authorized 23 MRSA §4209-B
Emissions Technical Committee
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §710 is enacted to read:
§710. Greenhouse gas emissions assessment and mitigation for capacity expansion
projects
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Authority" has the same meaning as in section 1964, subsection 2.
B. "Capacity expansion project" or "project" means a transportation project under the
jurisdiction of the department or the authority that results in modifications or other
changes to a transportation facility, including a roadway, transit service or parking
facility, and that is designed to improve vehicle travel time or increase maximum
throughput.
C. "Department" means the Department of Transportation.
D. "Greenhouse gas" has the same meaning as in Title 38, section 574, subsection 1.
E. "Induced demand" means an increase in demand for vehicle travel demonstrated by
an increase in vehicle miles traveled due to an increase in roadway supply, including,
but not limited to, new or expanded roads, additional vehicle capacity or additional
lane miles.
2. Impact assessment. Beginning July 1, 2026, prior to inclusion of a capacity
expansion project in a transportation improvement program, work plan or long-range
transportation plan of the department or the authority, the department or the authority, as
applicable, shall complete an impact assessment of the project in accordance with this
subsection.
A. The department and the authority shall each establish a process for completing
impact assessments required by this subsection, which must be designed to allow a
determination as to whether the capacity expansion project is consistent with the
transportation greenhouse gas emissions reductions plan under section 4209-C, the
transportation-related targets in the climate action plan under Title 38, section 577 and
the transportation sector greenhouse gas emissions limits under Title 38, section 576-A,
subsection 4-A. The impact assessment must, at a minimum, include projections for:
(1) Greenhouse gas emissions associated with the capacity expansion project over
a 20-year period;
(2) Net change in vehicle miles traveled for the affected transportation network as
a result of the capacity expansion project, informed by travel demand modeling,
induced demand modeling and, consistent with the United States Environmental
Protection Agency's motor vehicle emission simulator, air quality monitoring; and
Page 1 - 132LR1886(01)

(3) The direct impacts and induced demand impacts of the capacity expansion
project on vehicle miles traveled for the affected transportation network as a result
of the project.
In establishing an impact assessment process under this paragraph, the department and
the authority shall each solicit input from stakeholders. Every 2 years following the
initial establishment of an impact assessment process, the department and the authority
shall each review its established process and, following solicitation of stakeholder
input, implement necessary changes.
By January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department and the authority shall
publish on their respective publicly accessible websites a report outlining the travel
demand modeling and induced demand modeling used for the purposes of projecting
net change in vehicle miles traveled. The report must include a calibration and
validation report for the models used, documentation of the model components and key
parameters and a description of how the models used account for induced travel
demand associated with transportation system changes.
B. Following completion of an impact assessment for a capacity expansion project in
accordance with the process established pursuant to paragraph A, the department or the
authority, as applicable, shall:
(1) Proceed with the project as proposed if, through the impact assessment, the
department or the authority determines that the project is consistent with the plan,
targets and limits identified in paragraph A; or
(2) If, through the impact assessment, the department or authority determines that
the project is not consistent with the plan, targets and limits identified in paragraph
A:
(a) Alter the scope or design of the project to ensure greater consistency with
the plan, target or limits and complete a new impact assessment for the
modified project;
(b) Incorporate sufficient mitigation measures into the project in accordance
with subsection 3; or
(c) Halt project development and ensure that the project is not included in a
transportation improvement program, work plan or long-range transportation
plan of the department or the authority, as applicable.
3. Mitigation measures. If the department or the authority completes an impact
assessment for a capacity expansion project in accordance with subsection 2 and, through
that assessment, determines that the project is not consistent with the plan, targets and limits
identified in subsection 2, paragraph A, the department or the authority may proceed with
the project through incorporation of sufficient mitigation measures in accordance with this
subsection.
A. For the purposes of this section, "mitigation measure" or "measure" means a project,
program or operations modification that involves one or more of the following
measures:
Page 2 - 132LR1886(01)

(1) Transit expansion, including, but not limited to, expansion of regular route bus
transit, arterial or highway bus rapid transit, rail transit or intercity passenger rail
transit;
(2) Transit service improvements, including, but not limited to, increased service
level, transit fare reduction or transit priority treatment;
(3) Expansion of active transportation infrastructure;
(4) Expansion of micromobility infrastructure and service, including, but not
limited to, shared vehicle services;
(5) Expansion of transportation demand management measures, including, but not
limited to, vanpool or shared vehicle programs;
(6) Parking management measures, including, but not limited to, parking cost
adjustments or reduction or elimination of parking requirements;
(7) Land use measures, including, but not limited to, increases in residential
housing or other housing density, mixed use development or transit-oriented
development;
(8) Infrastructure improvements relating to traffic operations, including, but not
limited to, roundabouts or reduced-conflict intersections; and
(9) Congestion pricing or tolling measures.
B. A mitigation measure implemented with respect to a capacity expansion project by
the department or the authority, as applicable, is sufficient for the purposes of this
subsection if:
(1) The measure is specifically incorporated into the capacity expansion project
and the funding sources necessary for the implementation of the measure are
specifically identified in and committed to the project;
(2) The total greenhouse gas emissions associated with the project and net change
in vehicle miles traveled for the affected transportation network as a result of the
project, after accounting for emissions and vehicle miles traveled reductions
achieved through the incorporated mitigation measures, as determined by the
department or the authority, as applicable, is consistent with the transportation
greenhouse gas emissions reductions plan under section 4209-C, the
transportation-related targets in the climate action plan under Title 38, section 577
and the transportation sector greenhouse gas emissions limits under Title 38,
section 576-A, subsection 4-A;
(3) The incorporated measure is localized in accordance with paragraph C; and
(4) The project includes provisions to ensure that the measures are implemented
in substantially the same form as incorporated or in a revised form that still allows
the project to satisfy the requirements of subparagraph (2).
C. A mitigation measure to be incorporated into a capacity expansion project is
considered localized if implemented based on the following order of priority:
(1) The measure must be implemented within or associated with at least one
community affected by the project;
Page 3 - 132LR1886(01)

(2) If there is no location that satisfies subparagraph (1), the measure must be
implemented within or associated with an underserved community in the State, as
determined by the department or the authority, as applicable, based on available
federal or state data;
(3) If there is no location that satisfies subparagraph (1) or (2), the measure must
be implemented within or associated with the metropolitan planning organization
region in which the project is located; and
(4) If there is no location that satisfies subparagraphs (1) to (3), the measure may
be implemented at any location in the State or on a statewide basis, as determined
by the department or the authority, as applicable. If the department or the authority
localizes a mitigation measure pursuant to this subparagraph, it shall publish on its
publicly accessible website an explanation regarding the feasibility of and rationale
for not incorporating a different mitigation measure described in paragraph A.
4. Publication of information. The department and the authority shall publish on
their respective publicly accessible websites all information regarding impact assessments
and mitigation measures conducted by each entity pursuant to this section, including, but
not limited to, information regarding the capacity expansion projects subject to the
requirements of this section, the impact assessments under subsection 2 conducted for those
projects, the mitigation measures under subsection 3 implemented for those projects and
the final disposition of those projects.
5. Applicability. The requirements of this section do not apply to a capacity expansion
project:
A. That, prior to July 1, 2026, was included in a transportation improvement program,
work plan or long-range transportation plan of the department or the authority; or
B. For which the geometric layout was submitted to the department or the authority
for approval prior to July 1, 2026.
The requirements of this section are in addition to and do not affect the application of any
safety requirements or goals established by the department and the authority that must be
satisfied by the capacity expansion project pursuant to law or rule.
Sec. 3. 23 MRSA §4209-B is enacted to read:
§4209-B. Transportation Climate Technical Committee
1. Committee established. The Transportation Climate Technical Committee,
referred to in this section as "the committee," is established in accordance with Title 5,
section 12004‑I, subsection 84‑B to assist in the development and review of the
transportation greenhouse gas emissions reductions plan under section 4209-C, to assist the
department and the Maine Turnpike Authority in the implementation of the requirements
and processes for evaluating the greenhouse gas emissions and vehicle miles traveled
impacts associated with capacity expansion projects under section 710 and to otherwise
advise the department, the authority and the Legislature regarding achievement of the
transportation sector targets identified in the transportation greenhouse gas emissions
reductions plan under section 4209-C, the climate action plan under Title 38, section 577
and the greenhouse gas emissions reductions levels and limits under Title 38, section
576-A.
Page 4 - 132LR1886(01)

2. Membership. The committee must include, but is not limited to, the following
members:
A. The commissioner or the commissioner's designee;
B. The executive director of the Maine Turnpike Authority or the executive director's
designee; and
C. The following individuals appointed by the commissioner:
(1) One representative from a federally designated planning organization for the
Bangor region;
(2) One representative from a federally designated planning organization for the
Lewiston-Auburn region;
(3) One representative from a federally designated planning organization for the
Kittery region;
(4) One representative from a federally designated planning organization for the
Portland region;
(5) One representative of a regional transportation system based in Aroostook
County;
(6) One member who is a transit planner;
(7) One member with expertise in greenhouse gas emissions modeling and induced
demand modeling;
(8) One member who is an active transportation planner; and
(9) One member who is a transportation engineer.
3. Terms; vacancies. A member of the committee appointed pursuant to subsection
2, paragraph C serves for a term of 3 years. Terms must be staggered so that approximately
1/3 of the committee is renewed each calendar year. If a member is unable to complete the
term, the commissioner shall appoint a member from the same category of members listed
in subsection 2, paragraph C as the member who vacated the committee to serve out the
unexpired portion of the term.
4. Meetings and deliberations. The committee shall meet no less than 6 times per
year. The committee may form subcommittees and adopt bylaws and other policies to
effectively govern the committee's proceedings. The committee shall provide opportunities
for public participation and stakeholder feedback.
5. Report. The committee shall report on its deliberations and any recommendations,
including proposed legislation, by January 15, 2027, and biennially thereafter, to the
Governor and to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
transportation matters and over environment and natural resources matters. The report
must include, but is not limited to, an assessment of the current levels of transportation-
related greenhouse gas emissions and statewide vehicle miles traveled and
recommendations for strategies to reduce those emissions and miles consistent with the
targets identified in the transportation greenhouse gas emissions reductions plan under
section 4209-C, the climate action plan under Title 38, section 577 and the greenhouse gas
emissions reductions levels and limits under Title 38, section 576-A. After reviewing the
report, each committee may report out legislation relating to the report.
Page 5 - 132LR1886(01)

Sec. 4. 23 MRSA §4209-C is enacted to read:
§4209-C. Transportation greenhouse gas emissions reductions plan
In cooperation with the Maine Turnpike Authority, the Transportation Climate
Technical Committee under section 4209-B and metropolitan planning organizations in the
State, and in accordance with applicable federal transportation requirements and standards,
the department shall develop and, by July 1, 2026, publish a plan that, at a minimum, sets
forth strategies for reductions of greenhouse gas emissions from the transportation sector
necessary to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reductions levels and limits under Title
38, section 576-A, and strategies for reduction of statewide vehicle miles traveled in
accordance with the targets identified in the climate action plan under Title 38, section 577.
As applicable, the plan must be incorporated into the long-term planning processes of the
department and the Maine Turnpike Authority. The department shall periodically review
and, as necessary, publish updates to the plan under this section.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §576-A, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 476, §7, is amended
by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph to read:
The Department of Transportation, after consultation with the department, may shall adopt
rules as necessary to ensure compliance with the levels established by subsections 1 to 3.
Sec. 6. 38 MRSA §576-A, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Transportation sector greenhouse gas emissions limits. In accordance with
this subsection, by December 31, 2025, the department shall adopt rules establishing limits
on greenhouse gas emissions from the transportation sector.
A. Rules adopted by the department under this subsection must include greenhouse
gas emissions limits specific to different source categories within the transportation
sector that are designed to be achieved through biennial targets imposed over a 10-year
period and to ensure compliance with the levels established by subsections 1 to 3 and
with the transportation-specific greenhouse gas emissions reductions projections
established in the climate action plan under section 577, subsection 5-A.
B. At least every 4 years following the initial adoption of the transportation sector
greenhouse gas emissions limits rules under this subsection, the department shall
review those limits and determine whether additional changes are necessary to those
limits based on new greenhouse gas emissions reductions data, updates to the climate
action plan under section 577 or other information available to the department. If, as
a result of that review, the department determines that additional changes to the
transportation sector greenhouse gas emissions limits rules are necessary, the
department shall initiate rulemaking pursuant to this subsection to amend those rules.
C. After consultation with the department, the Department of Transportation shall
adopt rules necessary to ensure compliance with the transportation sector greenhouse
gas emissions limits established by the department pursuant to this subsection,
including, but not limited to, the adoption of rules establishing vehicle miles traveled
reduction levels.
Rules adopted by the department or the Department of Transportation pursuant to this
subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Page 6 - 132LR1886(01)